Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska89-1,104.01
Moisture Testing Examination Fund; created; use; investment; State Treasurer; duties.

The fees charged pursuant to section 89-1,104 shall be remitted by the Public Service Commission to the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall credit such fees to the Moisture Testing Examination Fund, which fund is hereby created. The fund shall be appropriated to the Public Service Commission to be used to cover the costs associated with the grain moisture measuring devices program. The money in such fund may be used at any time by the commission. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1992, LB 366, § 66;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 143;

Laws 2003, LB 735, § 16.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.